Utah statutes.
53B-17-103.   General powers of University of Utah related to public broadcasting and telecommunication for education.

(1)  Subject to applicable rules of the Federal Communications Commission and the State Board of Regents, the University of Utah shall:

(a)  serve as the state's provider of public television services, with programming from the Public Broadcasting Service and other syndicated and locally produced programs;

(b)  serve as the state's primary provider of public radio services, with programming from National Public Radio and other syndicated and locally produced programs; and

(c)  subject to Section 53B-7-103, accept and use gifts and apply for and receive funds from federal and other sources to carry out the purposes of this part.

(2)  Subject to future budget constraints, the Legislature shall provide an annual appropriation to operate KUED - TV.

(3)  This section neither regulates nor restricts a privately owned company in the distribution or dissemination of educational programs.

